Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB221.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 335.320 is amended to read as follows:
The board shall:
(1) Administer and enforce the provisions of this chapter and shall evaluate the
qualifications of license and permit applicants;
(2) Approve the examination required of applicants for licensure, provide for the
administration and grading of the examination, and provide for other matters
relating to licensure in the profession of marriage and family therapy;
(3) Review the credentials of licensees to determine if they are eligible for license
renewal and have paid the fee provided for in KRS 335.340;
(4) License the marriage and family therapist applicants who satisfy the experience and
educational requirements of KRS 335.330 and have paid the fee provided for in
KRS 335.330;
(5) Review and approve contracts between marriage and family therapy associates and
approved supervisors for their supervision of practice during the qualifying term;
(6) Issue permits to marriage and family therapy associate applicants who satisfy the
requirements of KRS 335.332;
(7) Adopt a code of ethics for licensed marriage and family therapists and marriage and
family therapy associates;
(8) Submit an annual report to the Governor and to the Legislative Research
Commission by January 1 of each year, listing all hearings conducted by the board
and any decisions rendered;[ and]
(9) Promulgate administrative regulations, in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A, to
implement the purpose and scope of KRS 335.300 to 335.399; and
(10) Enter into reciprocal agreements with boards of marriage and family therapy in
other states having licensure qualifications and requirements that meet or exceed
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 2/17/2025 9:17 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 482
those provided in this chapter.
Section 2. KRS 335.325 is amended to read as follows:
The board may:
(1) Employ needed personnel;
(2) Issue subpoenas, examine witnesses, pay appropriate witness fees, administer oaths,
and investigate allegations of practices violating the provisions of this chapter;
(3) Seek injunctive relief in Franklin Circuit Court to stop the unlawful practice of
marriage and family therapy by unlicensed persons;
(4) Conduct hearings pursuant to KRS Chapter 13B and keep records and minutes
necessary to carry out the functions of this chapter;
(5) Suspend or revoke licenses or permits or impose supervisory or probationary
conditions upon licensees or permit holders, or impose administrative disciplinary
fines, issue written reprimands or admonishments, or any combination thereof;
(6) Grant retired or inactive licensure status under conditions set forth by the board by
the promulgation of administrative regulations;
(7) [Enter into reciprocal agreements with boards of marriage and family therapy in
other states having licensure qualifications and requirements that meet or exceed
those provided in this chapter;
(8) ]Organize itself into two (2) panels to separate the functions of inquiry and
hearings. Each panel shall have the power to act as either an inquiry or hearing
panel. No member serving on the inquiry panel shall serve on the hearing panel for
any one particular case. Any final decision of the hearing panel shall be considered
as the final decision of the board and the hearing panel may exercise all powers
granted to the board pursuant to KRS Chapter 13B; and
(8)[(9)] Utilize mediation as a technique to resolve disciplinary matters.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 2/17/2025 9:17 AM Jacketed